Illinois, session 104th, SB3151.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Community College Economic Empowerment Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) community colleges play a crucial role in 9    providing accessible and affordable higher education to 10    the residents of this State;11        (2) the development of designated economically 12    disadvantaged areas, such as enterprise zones, HUBZones, 13    and opportunity zones, is essential for fostering 14    long-term economic growth and prosperity; and15        (3) the presence of community colleges within these 16    designated areas promotes educational advancement, 17    workforce development, and local economic revitalization. 18    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    "Community college" means a public community college 20district in this State.21    "Enterprise zone" means a geographic area designated by 22the State pursuant to the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act,   SB3151- 2 -LRB104 18520 LNS 31962 b1intended to stimulate economic development and job creation.2    "HUBZone" means a historically underutilized business zone 3designated by the United States Small Business Administration, 4which provides federal benefits to businesses located within 5the zone.6    "Opportunity zone" means a designated low-income 7community, under Section 13823 of the federal Tax Cuts and 8Jobs Act of 2017, that is eligible for tax incentives under the 9federal Qualified Opportunity Zone program. 10    Section 15. Funding eligibility.11    (a) The Illinois Community College Board shall provide an 12additional $1,000,000 per year in funding to community 13colleges whose primary campus is located: (i) within an 14enterprise zone; (ii) within a HUBZone; and (iii) within 2 15miles of an opportunity zone.16    (b) To qualify for funding under this Section, the 17community college must submit a request to the Illinois 18Community College Board, which shall verify that a campus 19meets the criteria set forth in subsection (a) and confirm the 20ongoing eligibility of the community college for such funding. 21    Section 20. Allocation of funds.22    (a) The annual allocation of funds under Section 15 shall 23be distributed equally among all eligible community colleges, 24as verified by the Illinois Community College Board, unless   SB3151- 3 -LRB104 18520 LNS 31962 b1otherwise directed by the General Assembly.2    (b) Funds provided pursuant to this Act shall be used 3exclusively for initiatives that support educational programs, 4workforce development, community engagement, infrastructure 5improvements, and other activities directly benefiting 6students and local communities. 7    Section 25. Reporting requirements.8    (a) Each community college receiving funding under this 9Act shall submit an annual report to the Illinois Community 10College Board detailing: (i) the total amount of funds 11received; (ii) how the funds were expended; (iii) the 12measurable impact on local economic development, student 13enrollment, and workforce outcomes; and (iv) any other 14information required by the Illinois Community College Board.15    (b) The Illinois Community College Board shall compile and 16submit an annual report to the General Assembly summarizing 17the use and impact of funds distributed under this Act. 18    Section 30. Appropriations. Implementation of this Act is 19subject to appropriation by the General Assembly. Subject to 20available appropriations, the Illinois Community College Board 21shall administer and distribute funds in accordance with this 22Act. 23    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are   SB3151- 4 -LRB104 18520 LNS 31962 b1severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.